Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-1109
Credit cards; prohibited; applicant or authorized gaming operator; requirements.

Credit cards shall not be accepted by any authorized gaming operator for payment for any wager or to purchase coins, tokens, or other forms of credit to be wagered on any game of chance. An account for the purpose of participating in a game of chance under the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act may only be funded with cash, coins, a debit card, or a direct link to an account with a financial institution in the name of the player. The commission shall require an authorized gaming operator or applicant for an authorized gaming operator license to demonstrate in the license application and internal controls application the ability to restrict credit card transactions.

Laws 2021, LB561, § 33.